Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.22
Microdistillery, defined.

Microdistillery means
a distillery located in Nebraska that is licensed to distill liquor on the
premises of the distillery licensee and produces ten thousand or fewer gallons
of liquor annually.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 30.